Nebraska, session 109, LB1248.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1248 LB1248
2026 2026
Section 1. Laws 2025, LB261, section 280, is amended to read:
Sec. 280. AGENCY NO. 84 — DEPARTMENT OF WATER, ENERGY, AND
ENVIRONMENT
Program No. 513 - Environmental Quality
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 5,593,323 43,593,323
GENERAL FUND 5,593,323 5,593,323
CASH FUND 42,816,431 43,115,996
FEDERAL FUND est. 45,798,301 46,175,320
PROGRAM TOTAL 94,208,055 132,884,639
PROGRAM TOTAL 94,208,055 94,884,639
SALARY LIMIT 18,821,791 19,216,295
The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the
appropriations and expenditures for this program according to the
following program classifications:
No. 513 - Administration
No. 586 - Water Quality
No. 587 - Land Quality
No. 588 - Air Quality
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$18,645,601 Cash Funds and $24,538,513 Federal Funds estimate for state
aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the
appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $38,000,000 General Funds,
$18,645,601 Cash Funds, and $24,529,499 Federal Funds estimate for state
aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance appropriated to the
Department of Natural Resources for this program existing on June 30,
2025, up to $6,000,000, is hereby reappropriated for providing grants to
metropolitan utilities districts for lead service line replacements in
accordance with section 71-5328.
There is included in the amount shown as aid for this program
-2-

LB1248 LB1248
2026 2026
$38,000,000 General Funds for FY2026-27 for the purpose of awarding a
grant to a city of the first class which operates a publicly owned
wastewater treatment facility that is subject to a National Pollutant
Discharge Elimination System permit and that has experienced documented
increases in industrial wastewater load resulting in treatment capacity
or compliance challenges due to a calcium caseinate food ingredient
manufacturing facility.
Sec. 2. Original Laws 2025, LB261, section 280, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-